Tennessee, session 114, HB1393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-126, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) The governor, acting through the commissioner of finance and
administration, is directed to submit to the federal centers for medicare and medicaid
services an application for a new waiver, no later than one hundred eighty (180) days
after the effective date of this act, that provides medical assistance coverage for
individuals whose gross annual income does not exceed one hundred thirty-eight
percent (138%) of the federal poverty level.
(b) A waiver requested pursuant to subsection (a), if approved by the federal
government and the commissioner of finance and administration, takes effect
immediately.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1393
003055
- 1 -